Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-1003
Police officer; prior service; how treated.

A police officer shall be credited with all years of his or her service after the year 1965 for the purpose of determining vested retirement benefits under the Cities of the First Class Police Officers Retirement Act.

Laws 1983, LB 237, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB1082, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB822, § 3.
July 18, 2026